Tennessee, session 114, SB0368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-704(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(a) There shall be paid from the general funds of the state to certain disabled
veterans the amount necessary to pay or reimburse such taxpayers for all of the local
property taxes paid for a given tax year on that property that the disabled veteran owned
and used as the disabled veteran's residence as provided in this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to tax years beginning on or after that date.
SB0368
000437
- 1 -